Virginia statutes. Title 63.2. Welfare (Social Services).
Article 1. General Provisions.

§ 63.2-900.
Accepting children for placement in homes, facilities, etc., by local boards.

Pursuant to §

63.2-319

, a local board shall have the right to accept for placement in suitable family homes, children’s residential facilities or independent living arrangements, subject to the supervision of the Commissioner and in accordance with regulations adopted by the Board, such persons under 18 years of age as may be entrusted to it by the parent, parents or guardian, committed by any court of competent jurisdiction, or placed through an agreement between it and the parent, parents or guardians where legal custody remains with the parent, parents, or guardians.The Board shall adopt regulations for the provision of foster care services by local boards, which shall be directed toward the prevention of unnecessary foster care placements and towards the immediate care of and permanent planning for children in the custody of or placed by local boards and that shall achieve, as quickly as practicable, permanent placements for such children. The local board shall first seek out kinship care options to keep children out of foster care and as a placement option for those children in foster care, if it is in the child’s best interests, pursuant to §

63.2-900.1

. In cases in which a child cannot be returned to his prior family or placed for adoption and kinship care is not currently in the best interests of the child, the local board shall consider the placement and services that afford the best alternative for protecting the child’s welfare. Placements may include but are not limited to family foster care, treatment foster care and residential care. Services may include but are not limited to assessment and stabilization, diligent family search, intensive in-home, intensive wraparound, respite, mentoring, family mentoring, adoption support, supported adoption, crisis stabilization or other community-based services. The Board shall also approve in foster care policy the language of the agreement required in §

63.2-902

. The agreement shall include at a minimum a Code of Ethics and mutual responsibilities for all parties to the agreement.Within 30 days of accepting for foster care placement a person under 18 years of age whose father is unknown, the local board shall request a search of the Virginia Birth Father Registry established pursuant to Article 7 (§

63.2-1249

et seq.) of Chapter 12 to determine whether any man has registered as the putative father of the child. If the search results indicate that a man has registered as the putative father of the child, the local board shall contact the man to begin the process to determine paternity.The local board shall, in accordance with the regulations adopted by the Board and in accordance with the entrustment agreement or other order by which such person is entrusted or committed to its care, have custody and control of the person so entrusted or committed to it until he is lawfully discharged, has been adopted or has attained his majority.Whenever a local board places a child where legal custody remains with the parent, parents or guardians, the board shall enter into an agreement with the parent, parents or guardians. The agreement shall specify the responsibilities of each for the care and control of the child.The local board shall have authority to place for adoption, and to consent to the adoption of, any child properly committed or entrusted to its care when the order of commitment or entrustment agreement between the parent or parents and the agency provides for the termination of all parental rights and responsibilities with respect to the child for the purpose of placing and consenting to the adoption of the child.The local board shall also have the right to accept temporary custody of any person under 18 years of age taken into custody pursuant to subdivision B of § 16.1-246 or §

63.2-1517

. The placement of a child in a foster home, whether within or without the Commonwealth, shall not be for the purpose of adoption unless the placement agreement between the foster parents and the local board specifically so stipulates.

Prior to the approval of any family for placement of a child, a home study shall be completed and the prospective foster or adoptive parents shall be informed that information about shaken baby syndrome, its effects, and resources for help and support for caretakers is available on a website maintained by the Department as prescribed in regulations adopted by the Board. Home studies by local boards shall be conducted in accordance with the Mutual Family Assessment home study template and any addenda thereto developed by the Department.

Prior to placing any such child in any foster home or children’s residential facility, the local board shall enter into a written agreement with the foster parents, pursuant to §

63.2-902

, or other appropriate custodian setting forth therein the conditions under which the child is so placed pursuant to §

63.2-902

. However, if a child is placed in a children’s residential facility licensed as a temporary emergency shelter, and a verbal agreement for placement is secured within eight hours of the child’s arrival at the facility, the written agreement does not need to be entered into prior to placement, but shall be completed and signed by the local board and the facility representative within 24 hours of the child’s arrival or by the end of the next business day after the child’s arrival.Agreements entered into pursuant to this subsection shall include a statement by the local board that all reasonably ascertainable background, medical, and psychological records of the child, including whether the child has been the subject of an investigation as the perpetrator of sexual abuse, have been provided to the foster home or children’s residential facility.

Within 72 hours of placing a child of school age in a foster care placement, as defined in §

63.2-100

, the local social services agency making such placement shall, in writing, (i) notify the principal of the school in which the student is to be enrolled and the superintendent of the relevant school division or his designee of such placement, and (ii) inform the principal of the status of the parental rights.If the documents required for enrollment of the foster child pursuant to § 22.1-3.1, 22.1-270 or 22.1-271.2, are not immediately available upon taking the child into custody, the placing social services agency shall obtain and produce or otherwise ensure compliance with such requirements for the foster child within 30 days after the child’s enrollment.

Every local board shall submit to the Department through its statewide automated system the names of all foster parents licensed to provide foster care services in the locality served by the local board and update such list quarterly.

History.

Code 1950, § 63-73; 1952, c. 409; 1960, c. 331; 1968, cc. 466, 578, § 63.1-56; 1975, cc. 248, 406; 1977, cc. 559, 562, 634, 645; 1978, c. 734; 1984, c. 734; 1986, c. 281; 1991, c. 34; 1994, c. 865; 1999, c. 889; 2002, c. 747; 2004, c. 70; 2005, cc. 343, 653; 2006, c. 360; 2008, cc. 241, 308; 2010, c. 551; 2011, cc. 9, 170; 2015, c. 531; 2017, cc. 193, 200; 2018, c. 694; 2019, c. 446.

Cross references.

For provision authorizing local board to accept and expend certain funds on behalf of children placed by or entrusted to it when no guardian has been appointed, see §

63.2-320

.

As to reimbursement of localities by the Commonwealth for certain expenditures, see §

63.2-401

.

As to parental or agency consent for adoption, and exceptions to consent requirement, see §

63.2-1202

.

As to placement of children for adoption by agency or local board, see §

63.2-1221

.

As to adoption assistance for adoption of children with special needs, see §

63.2-1300

et seq.

As to the criteria establishing eligibility for access to the state pool of funds to be allocated to community policy and management teams under the Children’s Services Act for children placed pursuant to this section, see §

2.2-5212

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2005, c. 343, cl. 2 provides: “That the Superintendent of Public Instruction and the Commissioner of the Department of Social Services shall issue a memorandum as soon as practicable after the enactment of this act to inform local school division superintendents and local social services agencies of its provisions.”

Acts 2005, c. 653, cl. 2 provides: “That the State Board of Social Services shall amend its home study regulations to allow homes to be dually approved as both foster and adoptive homes.”

Acts 2008, cc. 241 and 308, cl. 2 provides: “That the Board of Social Services shall approve the agreement in foster care policy by January 1, 2009, establishing the requirements of the agreement signed by foster parents prior to placement of children in their home as referenced in subsection C of §

63.2-900

of the Code of Virginia. In approving the foster care policy, the Board shall assure that the Department has secured input from representatives from foster and adoptive families, local boards and departments, child-placing agencies, judicial staff, youth in foster and adoptive homes, and such other advocates or experts as the Board deems necessary. The Board shall ensure that the agreement includes: (i) the identification of mutual responsibilities for foster parents, foster care workers, and directors of child-placing agencies, including local departments; and (ii) a Code of Ethics for all parties to the agreement. The model agreement shall be used by all local departments and private agencies and shall require the signature of each foster parent and worker, as well as the local department of social services’ or child-placing agency’s chief executive officer or his designee.”

Acts 2010, c. 192, provides: “That the Governor and the Department of Social Services, together with other appropriate executive branch agencies, shall develop a plan to increase the safe and permanent placement of children with families to reduce the number of children in foster care by 25 percent by 2020. The plan shall provide for the placement of children currently in foster care or children entering foster care in safe, appropriate, permanent living arrangements.”

Acts 2017, c. 193, cl. 2 provides: “That the Department of Social Services is authorized to amend or update its Mutual Family Assessment home study template and any addenda thereto when necessary to improve the process of adoptive and foster placements, provided such amendments or updates do not lessen the requirements of the home study process.”

Acts 2019, c. 446, cl. 2 provides: “That the Commissioner of Social Services shall establish within the State Department of Social Services (Department) a director of foster care health and safety position. The director of foster care health and safety shall (i) identify local boards of social services (local boards) that fail to provide foster care services in a manner that complies with applicable laws and regulations and ensures the health, safety, and well-being of all children in the supervision and control of the local board; (ii) ensure that local boards remedy such failures, including those related to caseworker visits, safe and appropriate placement settings, and the provision of physical, mental, and behavioral health screenings and services; (iii) ensure that reports of abuse, neglect, mistreatment, and deaths of children in foster care are properly investigated; (iv) manage the process through which the Department reviews children’s residential facility placements for medical necessity; and (v) track health outcomes of children in foster care. On or before November 30 of each year, the director of foster care health and safety shall report to the Governor and the General Assembly on the implementation and effectiveness of such objectives and any other issues relevant to the health, safety, and well-being of children in foster care.”

Acts 2019, c. 446, cl. 3 provides: “That the State Department of Social Services shall develop and implement a data-driven strategic plan, to be updated biennially, to improve the recruitment and retention of foster parents in the Commonwealth.”

Acts 2019, c. 446, cl. 4 provides: “That the State Department of Social Services shall develop and implement a more reliable, structured, and comprehensive case review and quality improvement process to monitor and improve foster care services provided by local boards and departments of social services in the Commonwealth.”

Acts 2019, c. 446, cl. 5 provides: “That the State Department of Social Services shall develop and implement an ongoing review process to monitor the placement of children by local boards of social services in children’s residential facilities and ensure that such placements are warranted by medical necessity for congregate care.”

Acts 2019, c. 446, cl. 6 provides: “That the State Department of Social Services shall develop and implement a process to (i) identify and review foster care cases in which the child has been in foster care for 24 months or longer; (ii) provide assistance to local boards and departments of social services to find a permanent home for such children; and (iii) conduct follow-up reviews of such cases annually to ensure that the local board and department of social services continue to make diligent efforts to secure a permanent home for such children.”

Effective date.

This title became effective October 1, 2002.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 70, in subsection A, substituted “18” for “eighteen” in two places, substituted “and that” for “and which” in the second sentence, and inserted the present third sentence; and substituted “24” for “twenty-four” in the last sentence of subsection B.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 343 added subsection D.

The 2005 amendment by c. 653 inserted subsection B and redesignated former subsection B as subsection C.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 360, in the second paragraph of subsection A, inserted “first” and “pursuant to §

63.2-900.1

” in the last sentence.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 241 and 308 are identical, and added the second and third sentences of the second paragraph of subsection A, and inserted “pursuant to §

63.2-902

” in the first sentence of subsection C.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 551 inserted “and the prospective foster or adoptive parents shall be informed that information about shaken baby syndrome, its effects, and resources for help and support for caretakers is available on a website maintained by the Department” in subsection B and made a minor stylistic change.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendments by cc. 9 and 170 are identical, and in the second paragraph in subsection A, added the second through fifth sentences, and deleted the former last sentence, which read: “The local board shall first seek out kinship care options to keep children out of foster care and as a placement option for those children in foster care, if it is in the child’s best interest, pursuant to §

63.2-900.1

.”

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 531 added the third paragraph of subsection A.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 193 added the last sentence in subsection B.

The 2017 amendment by c. 200 substituted “Virginia Birth Father Registry” for “Putative Father Registry” in the third paragraph of subsection A.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 694 added the last paragraph in subsection C.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 446 added subsection E.

Law Review.

For 2003/2004 survey of family and juvenile law, see 39 U. Rich. L. Rev. 241 (2004).

For 2006 survey article, “Family and Juvenile Law,” see 41 U. Rich. L. Rev. 151 (2006).

For essay, “Virginia Ranks Forty-Ninth of Fifty: The Need for Stronger Laws Supporting Foster Youth,” see 53 U. Rich. L. Rev. 255 (2018).

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 5-300. Checklist for Agency Adoption, et seq.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

14A M.J. Parent and Child, § 7.

§ 63.2-900.1.
Kinship foster care.

The local board shall, in accordance with regulations adopted by the Board, determine whether the child has any relative who may be eligible to become a kinship foster parent. Searches for relatives eligible to serve as kinship foster parents shall be conducted at the time the child enters foster care, at least annually thereafter, and prior to any subsequent changes to the child’s placement setting. The local board shall take all reasonable steps to provide notice to such relatives of their potential eligibility to become kinship foster parents and explain any opportunities such relatives may have to participate in the placement and care of the child, including opportunities available through kinship foster care or kinship guardianship.

If a relative requests to become the child’s kinship foster parent, the local board shall provide the relative with any forms or materials that must be submitted in order to become a kinship foster parent within no more than 15 days of such request. If the relative’s request to become a kinship foster parent is denied, the local board shall provide to the relative (i) a clear and specific explanation of the reasons for such denial, (ii) a statement that such denial is appealable pursuant to §

63.2-915

, and (iii) information regarding the procedure for filing such appeal.

Kinship foster care placements pursuant to this section shall be subject to all requirements of, and shall be eligible for all services related to, foster care placement contained in this chapter. Subject to approval by the Commissioner, a local board may grant a waiver of the Board’s standards for foster home approval, set forth in regulations, that are not related to safety. Training requirements may be waived for purposes of initial approval; however, such training requirements shall be completed within six months of the initial approval. If a local board determines that training requirements are a barrier to placement with a kinship foster parent and that placement with such kinship foster parent is in the child’s best interest, the local board shall submit a waiver request to the Commissioner. Waivers granted pursuant to this subsection shall be considered and, if appropriate, granted on a case-by-case basis and shall include consideration of the unique needs of each child to be placed. Upon request by a local board, the Commissioner shall review the local board’s decision and reasoning to grant a waiver and shall verify that the foster home approval standard being waived is not related to safety. If the Commissioner grants the waiver and allows approval of the home in accordance with Board regulations, the child may be placed in the home immediately. The approval or disapproval by the Commissioner of the local board’s waiver shall not be considered a case decision as defined in §

2.2-4001

.

The kinship foster parent shall be eligible to receive payment at the full foster care rate for the care of the child.

During the process of determining whether a person should be approved as a kinship foster parent, a local board shall not require that the child be removed from the physical custody of the kinship foster parent who is the subject of such approval process, provided the placement remains in the child’s best interest.

A child placed in kinship foster care pursuant to this section shall not be removed from the physical custody of the kinship foster parent, provided that the child has been living with the kinship foster parent for six consecutive months and the placement continues to meet approval standards for foster care, unless (i) the kinship foster parent consents to the removal; (ii) removal is agreed upon at a family partnership meeting as defined by the Department; (iii) removal is ordered by a court of competent jurisdiction; or (iv) removal is warranted pursuant to §

63.2-1517

.

For purposes of this section, “relative” means an adult who is (i) related to the child by blood, marriage, or adoption or (ii) fictive kin of the child.

History.

2006, c. 360; 2012, c. 568; 2014, c. 257; 2016, c. 25; 2019, cc. 437, 438, 446; 2020, cc. 224, 366, 562; 2022, cc. 561, 562.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2014, c. 530, cl. 1 provides: “That the Department of Social Services shall review current policies governing facilitation of placement of children in kinship care to avoid foster care placements in the Commonwealth and shall develop recommendations for regulations governing kinship care placements, which shall include recommendations related to (i) a description of the rights and responsibilities of local boards, birth parents, and kinship caregivers; (ii) a process for the facilitation of placement or transfer of custody; (iii) a model disclosure letter to be provided to the parents and potential kinship caregivers, including information about the differences between kinship care and kinship foster care, the impact of transferring custody from the birth parent to the kinship caregiver, the birth parent’s role following transfer, and the plan requirements for custody to be returned to the birth parent; (iv) a process for developing a safety or service plan for the family, which shall include gathering input from birth parents, potential kinship caregivers, and other community and family supports; (v) a description of funding sources available to support safety or service plans; (vi) a process for gathering and reporting data regarding the well-being and permanency of children in kinship care; and (vii) a description of the training plan for local department of social services workers. The Department shall also review the fiscal impact of proposed regulations. The Department shall report its recommendations and findings to the Governor, the General Assembly, and the Board of Social Services by January 1, 2016.”

Acts 2020, c. 562, cl. 2 provides: “That the Department of Social Services shall develop a training program that is tailored to persons seeking approval as a kinship foster parent. Such program shall take into consideration the unique characteristics of kinship foster care placements and include information regarding services, funding, options, and other resources that will be available to the kinship foster parent.”

Acts 2020, c. 562, cl. 3 provides: “That the Department of Social Services (the Department) shall develop a document that provides comprehensive information regarding kinship foster care, including information about available services, funding, options, and other resources. The Department shall make such document available on its website and require local boards of social services to provide information about such document to all potential kinship foster parents.”

Acts 2020, c. 562, cl. 4 provides: “That the Department of Social Services shall provide training to local boards of social services regarding the process through which a person may be approved as a kinship foster parent without requiring removal of the child from the physical custody of such person.”

Acts 2020, c. 562, cl. 5 provides: “That the Board of Social Services (the Board) shall promulgate regulations to implement the provisions of this act, including the process for relative foster home approval. The Board’s initial adoption of regulations necessary to implement the provisions of this act shall be exempt from the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq. of the Code of Virginia), except that the Board shall provide an opportunity for public comment on the regulations prior to adoption.”

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 568 added the second and third sentences of subsection B.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 257 added subsection D.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 25, in subsection B, rewrote the second sentence, which read “However, the Commissioner may grant a variance from the requirements of this chapter pursuant to 42 U.S.C. § 671 (a)(10) and allow the placement of a child in with a kinship foster care provider when he determines that (i) the requirement would impose a substantial hardship on the kinship foster care provider and (ii) the variance would not adversely affect the safety and well-being of the child to be placed in an arrangement for kinship care as defined in §

63.2-100

or with the kinship foster care provider.”, substituted “Waivers” for “Variances” in the third sentence, and added the last two sentences.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendments by cc. 437 and 438 are identical, and in subsection A, substituted “any relative who may be” for “a relative who is” and added the last sentence; and made stylistic changes.

The 2019 amendment by c. 446 added the second sentence to subsection A.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by cc. 224 and 366 are identical and added subsection E, which was redesignated as subsection F at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

The 2020 amendment by c. 562 inserted the third, fourth, and next to last sentences in subsection B; inserted subsection D and redesignated former subsection D as subsection E.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendments by cc. 561 and 562 are identical, and added the second paragraph of subsection A.

Law Review.

For 2006 survey article, “Family and Juvenile Law,” see 41 U. Rich. L. Rev. 151 (2006).

§ 63.2-900.2.
Placement of sibling groups; visitation.

All reasonable steps shall be taken to place siblings entrusted to the care of a local board or licensed child-placing agency, committed to the care of a local board or agency by any court of competent jurisdiction, or placed with a local board or public agency through an agreement between a local board or a public agency and the parent, parents, or guardians, where legal custody remains with the parent, parents, or guardian, together in the same foster home.

Where siblings are placed in separate foster homes, the local department, child-placing agency, or public agency shall develop a plan to encourage frequent and regular visitation or communication between the siblings. The visitation or communication plan shall take into account the wishes of the child, and shall specify the frequency of visitation or communication, identify the party responsible for encouraging that visits or communication occur, and state any other requirements or restrictions related to such visitation or communication as may be determined necessary by the local department, child-placing agency, or public agency.

History.

2008, c. 397.

§ 63.2-900.3.
School placement of children in foster care.

When placing a child of school age in a foster care placement, as defined in §

63.2-100

, the local social services agency making such placement shall, in writing, determine jointly with the local school division whether it is in the child’s best interests to remain enrolled at the school in which he was enrolled prior to the most recent foster care placement, pursuant to § 22.1-3.4.

History.

2011, c. 154; 2012, c. 711.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 711 substituted “When placing” for “Before placing.”

§ 63.2-901.
Supervision of placement of children in homes.

The local director shall supervise the placement in suitable homes of children placed through an agreement with the parents or guardians or entrusted or committed to the local board pursuant to §§

63.2-900

,

63.2-902

and

63.2-903

.

History.

Code 1950, § 63-89; 1968, c. 578, § 63.1-67.2; 1994, c. 865; 2002, c. 747.